Hawaii statutes.
§201B-8 Convention center enterprise
special fund. (a) There is established the convention center enterprise
special fund, into which shall be deposited:

(1) A portion of the revenues from the transient
accommodations tax, as provided by section 237D-6.5;

(2) All revenues or moneys derived from the
operations of the convention center to include all revenues from the food and
beverage service, all revenues from the parking facilities or from any
concession, and all revenues from the sale of souvenirs, logo items, or any
other items offered for purchase at the convention center;

(3) Private contributions, interest, compensation,
gross or net revenues, proceeds, or other moneys derived from any source or for
any purpose arising from the use of the convention center facility; and

(4) Appropriations by the legislature, including any
transfers from the tourism special fund established under section 201B-11 for
marketing the facility pursuant to section 201B-7(a)(7).

(b) Moneys in the convention center enterprise
special fund shall be used by the authority for the payment of any and all of
the following:

(1) Debt owed to the department
of budget and finance relating to the convention center; and

(2) Expenses arising from any and all use, operation,
maintenance, alteration, improvement, or any unforeseen or unplanned repairs of
the convention center, including without limitation the food and beverage
service and parking service provided at the convention center facility, the
sale of souvenirs, logo items, or other items, for any future major repair,
maintenance, and improvement of the convention center facility as a commercial
enterprise or as a world class facility for conventions, entertainment, or
public events, and for marketing the facility pursuant to section 201B-7(a)(7).

(c) Moneys in the convention center enterprise
special fund may be:

(1) Placed in interest-bearing accounts; provided
that the depository in which the money is deposited furnishes security as
provided in section 38-3; or

(2) Otherwise invested by the authority until such
time as the moneys may be needed; provided that the authority shall limit its
investments to those listed in section 36-21.

All interest accruing from investment of the moneys
shall be credited to the convention center enterprise special fund. [L 2002, c
253, §2; am L 2005, c 235, §6; am L 2014, c 81, §3; am L 2015, c 121, §6]

Note

Conditional repeal of L 2015, c 121 on January 1, 2016. L
2015, c 121, §17(1).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next